Washington statutes.
RCW 43.83.020

State building construction account.

(1) The state building construction account is hereby established in the state treasury and shall be used exclusively for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of the capital appropriation acts.

(2) During the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys from the state building construction account to the advanced environmental mitigation revolving account.

[ 2019 c 413 s 7031; 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 33; 2004 c 276 s 907; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 46; 1987 1st ex.s. c 3 s 9; 1985 c 57 s 43; 1965 c 8 s 43.83.020. Prior: 1959 ex.s. c 9 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Severability—Effective date—2004 c 276: See notes following RCW 43.330.167.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.